pt-BR: Quilha de windsurf estilo: All-round; Iniciante; Bump & jump; Foil; Freerace; Freeride; Freestyle; Freewave; Vento fraco; Água rasa; Slalom; Speed; Wave; Anti-algas (Weed); Outro
hr-HR: Stil peraja za jedrenje na dasci: Univerzalna; Za početnike; Bump & Jump; Foil; Freerace; Freeride; Freestyle; Freewave; Za slab vjetar; Plitka voda; Slalom; Brzina; Valovi; Weed; Ostalo
ko: 윈드서핑 핀 방식: 올라운드; 초보자용; 범프 & 점프; 포일; 프리레이스; 프리라이드; 프리스타일; 프리웨이브; 라이트윈드; 얕은 물; 슬라롬; 스피드; 웨이브; 수초용; 기타
fr: Type d’aileron de planche à voile: Polyvalent; Débutant; Bump & Jump; Foil; Freerace; Freeride; Freestyle; Freewave; Lightwind; Eau peu profonde; Slalom; Speed; Vague; Anti-algues; Autre
el: Στυλ πτερυγίου windsurf: All-round; Για αρχάριους; Bump & jump; Foil; Freerace; Freeride; Freestyle; Freewave; Ελαφρού ανέμου; Ρηχών νερών; Σλάλομ; Ταχύτητας; Wave; Weed; Άλλο
ro-RO: Stil de aripioare de windsurfing: Universal; Începător; Bump & jump; Foil; Freerace; Freeride; Freestyle; Freewave; Vânt slab; Apă mică; Slalom; Viteză; Val; Alge; Altele
pt-PT: Estilo da quilha de windsurf: Versátil; Iniciante; Bump & jump; Foil; Freerace; Freeride; Freestyle; Freewave; Vento fraco; Águas rasas; Slalom; Velocidade; Onda; Anti-algas; Outro
sv: Typ av vindsurfingfena: Allround; Nybörjare; Bump & jump; Foil; Freerace; Freeride; Freestyle; Freewave; Lättvind; Grunt vatten; Slalom; Speed; Våg; Sjögräs; Övrigt
tr: Rüzgar sörfü yüzgeci tarzı: Çok yönlü; Başlangıç seviyesi; Bump & jump; Foil; Freerace; Freeride; Freestyle; Freewave; Hafif rüzgar; Sığ su; Slalom; Hız; Dalga; Yosun; Diğer
zh-CN: 帆板尾鳍款式: 全能; 初学者; 颠簸与跳跃; 水翼; 自由竞速; 自由骑行; 自由式; 自由冲浪; 微风; 浅水; 障碍滑水; 速度; 冲浪; 水草; 其他
fi: Purjelautailun evän tyyli: Yleiskäyttö; Aloittelija; Bump & jump; Foil; Freerace; Freeride; Freestyle; Freewave; Kevyt tuuli; Matala vesi; Slalom; Nopeus; Wave; Leväevä; Muu
nl: Windsurfvin  type: Allround; Beginner; Bump & jump; Foil; Freerace; Freeride; Freestyle; Freewave; Lichtweer; Ondiep water; Slalom; Speed; Wave; Weed; Overige
da: Finnestil til windsurfing: All-round; Begynder; Bump & jump; Foil; Freerace; Freeride; Freestyle; Freewave; Lightwind; Lavt vand; Slalom; Speed; Wave; Weed; Andet
th: สไตล์ครีบวินด์เซิร์ฟ: ออลราวด์; ผู้เริ่มต้น; บัมป์แอนด์จัมป์; ฟอยล์; ฟรีเรซ; ฟรีไรด์; ฟรีสไตล์; ฟรีเวฟ; ลมเบา; น้ำตื้น; สลาลอม; ความเร็ว; โต้คลื่น; กันสาหร่าย; อื่นๆ
cs: Styl windsurfingových ploutví: Univerzální; Pro začátečníky; Bump & jump; Foil; Freerace; Freeride; Freestyle; Freewave; Do slabého větru; Do mělké vody; Slalom; Rychlostní; Do vln; Do vodních trav; Jiné
bg-BG: Стил на финката за уиндсърф: Универсален; Начинаещи; Бъмп енд джъмп; Фойл; Фрирейс; Фрирайд; Фристайл; Фриуейв; Слаб вятър; Плитки води; Слалом; Скорост; Вълни; Водорасли; Друго
de: Windsurf-Finnentyp: Allround; Einsteiger; Bump & Jump; Foil; Freerace; Freeride; Freestyle; Freewave; Leichtwind; Flachwasser; Slalom; Speed; Wave; Seegras; Sonstige
sk-SK: Štýl windsurfingových plutiev: Univerzálne; Pre začiatočníkov; Bump & jump; Foil; Freerace; Freeride; Freestyle; Freewave; Slabý vietor; Plytká voda; Slalom; Rýchlostné; Do vĺn; Do rias; Iné
ja: ウィンドサーフィンフィンスタイル: オールラウンド; 初心者; バンプ＆ジャンプ; フォイル; フリーレース; フリーライド; フリースタイル; フリーウェーブ; ライトウィンド; シャローウォーター; スラローム; スピード; ウェーブ; ウィード; その他
zh-TW: 風浪板鰭片樣式: 全能; 初學者; 波浪騰空; 水翼; 自由競速; 自由滑行; 花式; 自由衝浪; 微風; 淺水; 迴轉競速; 競速; 衝浪; 防草; 其他
lt-LT: Burlenčių pelekų stilius: Universalus; Pradedantiesiems; Bump & jump; Foil; Freerace; Freeride; Freestyle; Freewave; Silpnam vėjui; Sekliam vandeniui; Slalomo; Greičio; Bangų; Žolėtiems telkiniams; Kita
vi: Kiểu vây lướt ván: Toàn diện; Người mới bắt đầu; Bật nhảy; Foil; Đua tự do (Freerace); Trượt tự do (Freeride); Thể hiện kỹ năng (Freestyle); Lướt sóng tự do (Freewave); Gió nhẹ; Nước nông; Trượt zíc zắc; Tốc độ; Lướt sóng; Chống vướng rong; Khác
pl: Styl statecznika windsurfingowego: Wszechstronny; Dla początkujących; Bump & jump; Foil; Freerace; Freeride; Freestyle; Freewave; Słaby wiatr; Płytka woda; Slalom; Speed; Wave; Weed (antygrass); Inny
nb: Finnestil for windsurfing: Allround; Nybegynner; Bump & jump; Foil; Freerace; Freeride; Freestyle; Freewave; Lightwind; Grunt vann; Slalåm; Hastighet; Bølge; Sjøgress; Annet
sl-SI: Stil smernika za deskanje na deski: Vsestransko; Začetniki; Bump in jump; Foil; Freerace; Freeride; Freestyle; Freewave; Rahel veter; Plitka voda; Slalom; Hitrost; Valovi; Trava; Drugo
es: Estilo de la aleta de windsurf: Polivalente; Principiante; Bump & jump; Foil; Freerace; Freeride; Freestyle; Freewave; Lightwind; Aguas poco profundas; Eslalon; Velocidad; Olas; Antialgas; Otro
ru: Стиль плавника для виндсерфинга: Универсальный; Для начинающих; Бамп-энд-джамп (bump & jump); Фойл; Фрирейс; Фрирайд; Фристайл; Фривейв; Лайтвинд; Для мелководья; Слалом; Скоростной; Вейв; Для водорослей; Другое
it: Stile della pinna da windsurf: All-round; Principianti; Bump & jump; Foil; Freerace; Freeride; Freestyle; Freewave; Vento leggero; Acque poco profonde; Slalom; Speed; Wave; Antialga; Altro
hu: Vitorla típusa: All-round; Kezdő; Bump & jump; Foil; Freerace; Freeride; Freestyle; Freewave; Lightwind; Sekély víz; Szlalom; Sebesség; Wave; Hínármentesítő; Egyéb
en: Windsurf fin style: All-round; Beginner; Bump & jump; Foil; Freerace; Freeride; Freestyle; Freewave; Lightwind; Shallow water; Slalom; Speed; Wave; Weed; Other